California, session 20252026, AB975.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1610 of the Fish and Game Code is amended to read:1610. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this chapter does not apply to any of the following:(1) Immediate emergency work necessary to protect life or property.(2) Immediate emergency repairs to public service facilities necessary to maintain service as a result of a disaster in an area in which a state of emergency has been proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(3) Emergency projects undertaken, carried out, or approved by a state or local governmental agency to maintain, repair, or restore an existing highway, as defined in Section 360 of the Vehicle Code, within the existing right-of-way of the highway, that has been damaged as a result of fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide, within one year of the damage. Work needed in the vicinity above and below a highway may be conducted outside of the existing right-of-way if it is needed to stop ongoing or recurring mudslides, landslides, or erosion that pose an immediate threat to the highway, or to restore those roadways damaged by mudslides, landslides, or erosion to their predamage condition and functionality. This paragraph does not exempt from this chapter any project undertaken, carried out, or approved by a state or local governmental agency to expand or widen a highway damaged by fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide. The exception provided in this paragraph does not apply to a highway designated as an official state scenic highway pursuant to Section 262 of the Streets and Highways Code.(4) (A) Projects to repair or reconstruct a bridge 30 feet long or less or a culvert 70 feet long or less within the County of Sutter that has been damaged or destroyed as a result of fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide, between January 1, 2022, and December 31, 2024, inclusive, except that a project listed in Environmental Permit Information Management System (EPIMS) Notification No. SUT-53568-R2, executed on January 31, 2025, pursuant to this chapter, is not an eligible project under this paragraph.(B) The entity undertaking a project pursuant to this paragraph shall conduct a biological survey to identify any species that are present, consult with the department on appropriate species protection measures, and implement those recommended measures.(C) This paragraph shall not apply to the state highway system or at locations of intersection or connection to the state highway system.(D) This paragraph shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and is inoperative thereafter.(b) The entity performing the work described in subdivision (a) shall notify the department of the work, in writing, within 14 days of beginning the work. Any work described in the notification that does not meet the criteria for the work described in subdivision (a) is a violation of this chapter if the entity did not first notify the department in accordance with Section 1602 or 1611.(c) This chapter does not apply to activities undertaken pursuant to Section 1242.1 of the Water Code.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because the need to repair the County of Sutter’s bridges and culverts, which are often in rural areas and vital to evacuation routes in the event of an emergency, presents a unique risk that needs to be urgently remedied.